Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Confidentiality and Security of Information

393A.770.
Definitions — Applicability.

As used in KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

, “personal information” means:

Information that identifies or reasonably can be used to identify an individual, such as first and last name in combination with the individual’s:

Social Security number or other government-issued number or identifier;

Date of birth;

Home or physical address;

Electronic-mail address or other online contact information or Internet provider address;

Financial account number or credit or debit card number;

Biometric data, health or medical data, or insurance information; or

Passwords or other credentials that permit access to an online or other account;

Personally identifiable financial or insurance information, including nonpublic personal information defined by applicable federal law; and

Any combination of data that, if accessed, disclosed, modified, or destroyed without authorization of the owner of the data or if lost or misused, would require notice or reporting under KRS

365.720

to

365.730

and federal privacy and data security law, whether or not the administrator or the administrator’s agent is subject to the law.

Any provision of KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

that applies to the administrator or the administrator’s records applies to an administrator’s agent or the agent’s records.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 77, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.780.
Confidential information.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the following are confidential and exempt from public inspection or disclosure:

Records of the administrator and the administrator’s agent related to the administration of this chapter;

Reports and records of a holder in the possession of the administrator or the administrator’s agent; and

Personal information and other information derived or otherwise obtained by or communicated to the administrator or the administrator’s agent from an examination under this chapter of the records of a person.

A record or other information that is confidential under law of this state other than this chapter, another state, or the United States continues to be confidential when disclosed or delivered under this chapter to the administrator or administrator’s agent.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 78, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.790.
When confidential information may be disclosed.

When reasonably necessary to enforce or implement this chapter, the administrator may disclose confidential information concerning property held by the administrator or the administrator’s agent only to:

An apparent owner or the apparent owner’s personal representative, attorney, other legal representative, relative, or agent designated under KRS

393A.760

to have the information;

The personal representative, executor, other legal representative, relative of a deceased apparent owner, agent designated under KRS

393A.760

by the deceased apparent owner, or a person entitled to inherit from the deceased apparent owner;

Another department or agency of this state or the United States;

The person that administers the unclaimed property law of another state, if the other state accords substantially reciprocal privileges to the administrator of this state if the other state is required to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained in a manner substantially equivalent to KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

; or

A person subject to an examination as required by KRS 393A.580(6).

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 393A.780(1), the administrator shall include on the Web site or in the database required by KRS 393A.290(2)(b) the name of each apparent owner of property held by the administrator. The administrator may include in published notices, printed publications, telecommunications, the Internet, or other media and on the Web site or in the database additional information concerning the apparent owner’s property if the administrator believes the information will assist in identifying and returning property to the owner and does not disclose personal information except the home or physical address of an apparent owner.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall not use confidential information provided to them or in their possession, except as expressly authorized by this chapter or required by law other than this chapter.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 79, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2018). Although 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 163, sec. 79, contained a citation to "Section 60 of this Act" (codified as KRS

393A.600

) in subsection (1)(e) of this statute, it is clear from the context that Section 58 (codified as KRS

393A.580

) was intended, and this manifest clerical or typographical error was
corrected in codification under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

393A.800.
Confidentiality
agreement.

A person to be examined under KRS

393A.560

may
require, as a condition of disclosure of the records of the person
to be examined, that each person having access to the records disclosed
in the examination execute and deliver to the person to be examined
a confidentiality agreement that:

Is in a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the administrator; and

Requires the person having access to the records to comply with the provisions of KRS

393A.770

to

393A.830

applicable to the person.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 80, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.810.
No confidential
information in notice.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

393A.270

and

393A.280

, a holder
shall not be required under this chapter to include confidential information
in a notice the holder is required to provide to an apparent owner
under this chapter.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 81, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.820.
Security
of information.

If a holder is required to include confidential information in a report to the administrator, the information shall be provided by a secure means.

If confidential information in a record is provided to and maintained by the administrator or administrator’s agent as required by this chapter, the administrator or agent shall:

Implement administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information as required by KRS

365.720

to

365.730

and federal privacy and data security law, whether or not the administrator or the administrator’s agent is subject to the law;

Protect against reasonably anticipated threats or hazards to the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; and

Protect against unauthorized access to or use of the information which could result in substantial harm or inconvenience to a holder or the holder’s customers, including insureds, annuitants, and policy or contract owners and their beneficiaries.

The administrator:

After notice and comment, shall adopt and implement a security plan that identifies and assesses reasonably foreseeable internal and external risks to confidential information in the administrator’s possession and seeks to mitigate the risks; and

Shall ensure that an administrator’s agent adopts and implements a similar plan with respect to confidential information in the agent’s possession.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall educate and train their employees regarding the plan adopted under subsection (3) of this section.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall in a secure manner return or destroy all confidential information no longer reasonably needed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 82, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.830.
Security
breach.

Except to the extent prohibited by law other than this chapter, the administrator or administrator’s agent shall notify a holder as soon as practicable of:

A suspected loss, misuse or unauthorized access, disclosure, modification, or destruction of confidential information obtained from the holder in the possession of the administrator or an administrator’s agent; and

Any interference with operations in any system hosting or housing confidential information which:

Compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; or

Creates a substantial risk of identity fraud or theft.

Except as necessary to inform an insurer, attorney, investigator, or others as required by law, the administrator and an administrator’s agent shall not disclose, without the express consent in a record of the holder, an event described in subsection (1) of this section to a person whose confidential information was supplied by the holder.

If an event described in subsection (1) of this section occurs, the administrator and the administrator’s agent shall:

Take action necessary for the holder to understand and minimize the effect of the event and determine its scope; and

Cooperate with the holder with respect to:

Any notification required by law concerning a data or other security breach; and

A regulatory inquiry, litigation, or similar action.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 83, effective July 14, 2018.